apertium-en-hi.hi.dix
    <pardef n="ऐ__n_f">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="गम__n_m">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ों</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="मचिय/ा__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ा</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ा</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ाँ</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ों</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="नति__n_f">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>याँ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>यों</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="थ/ू__n_m">               
   	  <e><p><l>ू</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ू</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ू</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुओं</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="ध/ा__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ा</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ों</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="इ__n_m">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>यों</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="हनु__n_f">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>एँ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ओं</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="माँ__n_f">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>यें</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ओं</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
	<pardef n="माँ__n_m">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>यें</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ओं</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="दवा/अ__n_f">
      <e><p><l>अ</l><r>अ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>अ</l><r>अ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>एं</l><r>अ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ओं</l><r>अ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="ग/ऊ__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ऊ</l><r>ऊ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ऊ</l><r>ऊ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>उएँ</l><r>ऊ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>उयें</l><r>ऊ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>उओं</l><r>ऊ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="पौ/आ__n_m">
      <e><p><l>आ</l><r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ए</l><r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ए</l><r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ओं</l><r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="कम/ी__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ियाँ</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ियों</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="/ऊ__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ऊ</l><r>ऊ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ऊ</l><r>ऊ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ऊ</l><r>ऊ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>उओं</l><r>ऊ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="जरद/ा__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ा</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ों</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="ऋ__n_m">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ओं</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="हठ/ी__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ियों</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ियों</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="गौ__n_f">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>एँ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>वों</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="गेह/ूँ__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ूँ</l><r>ूँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ूँ</l><r>ूँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ूँ</l><r>ूँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुँओं</l><r>ूँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     

    <e lm="गऊ"><i>ग</i><par n="ग/ऊ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="दगाबाजी"><i>दगाबाज</i><par n="कम/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="तंबू"><i>तंब</i><par n="थ/ू__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="अँटिया"><i>अँटिय</i><par n="मचिय/ा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="शराबखोरी"><i>शराबखोर</i><par n="कम/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="जरदा"><i>जरद</i><par n="जरद/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="माँ"><i>माँ</i><par n="माँ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="रितु"><i>रितु</i><par n="हनु__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="अपमार्गी"><i>अपमार्ग</i><par n="हठ/ी__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="आरण्यपशु"><i>आरण्यपशु</i><par n="ऋ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="फाटक"><i>फाटक</i><par n="गम__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रतिपूर्ति"><i>प्रतिपूर्ति</i><par n="इ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="चँदवा"><i>चँदव</i><par n="ध/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="चालबाजी"><i>चालबाज</i><par n="कम/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="पौआ"><i>पौ</i><par n="पौ/आ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="बुलंदआवाजाअ"><i>बुलंदआवाजा</i><par n="दवा/अ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="वन्यवृत्ति"><i>वन्यवृत्ति</i><par n="नति__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="काजू"><i>काज</i><par n="थ/ू__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="परीक्षाअ"><i>परीक्षा</i><par n="दवा/अ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="कब्रिस्तान"><i>कब्रिस्तान</i><par n="गम__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="चंद्रमा"><i>चंद्रमा</i><par n="माँ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="मजहब"><i>मजहब</i><par n="गम__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रेमी"><i>प्रेम</i><par n="हठ/ी__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="हेमकर्ता"><i>हेमकर्ता</i><par n="ऋ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="मृत्यु"><i>मृत्यु</i><par n="हनु__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ताऊ"><i>ता</i><par n="/ऊ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="मुठिया"><i>मुठिय</i><par n="मचिय/ा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="कछुआ"><i>कछु</i><par n="पौ/आ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ठोखाअ"><i>ठोखा</i><par n="दवा/अ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="महाकवि"><i>महाकवि</i><par n="इ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="कूडाखाना"><i>कूडाखान</i><par n="ध/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="कदम"><i>कदम</i><par n="गम__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ओषधि"><i>ओषधि</i><par n="नति__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="बिच्छू"><i>बिच्छ</i><par n="थ/ू__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ढलवाँ"><i>ढलवाँ</i><par n="माँ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="लाला"><i>लाला</i><par n="ऋ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="मदारी"><i>मदार</i><par n="हठ/ी__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="गुझिया"><i>गुझिय</i><par n="मचिय/ा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="मछुआ"><i>मछु</i><par n="पौ/आ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="साजिशीअ"><i>साजिशी</i><par n="दवा/अ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="जायका"><i>जायक</i><par n="जरद/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ढलुआँ"><i>ढलुआँ</i><par n="माँ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="हनु"><i>हनु</i><par n="हनु__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="त्रिमूर्ति"><i>त्रिमूर्ति</i><par n="इ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="मजाक"><i>मजाक</i><par n="गम__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="गौ"><i>गौ</i><par n="गौ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="वक्रचंचु"><i>वक्रचंचु</i><par n="ऋ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="अजूबा"><i>अजूब</i><par n="ध/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="निराशावादी"><i>निराशावाद</i><par n="हठ/ी__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="टिकाऊ"><i>टिका</i><par n="/ऊ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ऊ"><i></i><par n="/ऊ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="असम्मति"><i>असम्मति</i><par n="नति__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="मुनाफा"><i>मुनाफ</i><par n="जरद/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="डलिया"><i>डलिय</i><par n="मचिय/ा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="उल्लू"><i>उल्ल</i><par n="थ/ू__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="अँखुआ"><i>अँखु</i><par n="पौ/आ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="अम्माँ"><i>अम्माँ</i><par n="माँ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="स्वस्ति"><i>स्वस्ति</i><par n="इ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="वस्तु"><i>वस्तु</i><par n="हनु__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="जनेऊ"><i>जने</i><par n="/ऊ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="खन्ना"><i>खन्न</i><par n="ध/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="कमी"><i>कम</i><par n="कम/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="उक्ति"><i>उक्ति</i><par n="नति__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="गलसुआ"><i>गलसु</i><par n="पौ/आ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="जंतु"><i>जंतु</i><par n="ऋ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="जम्मू"><i>जम्म</i><par n="थ/ू__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="खयाल"><i>खयाल</i><par n="गम__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="तँबोली"><i>तँबोल</i><par n="हठ/ी__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="लिच्छवि"><i>लिच्छवि</i><par n="इ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="बोरिया"><i>बोरिय</i><par n="मचिय/ा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="बाहु"><i>बाहु</i><par n="हनु__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="कीमा"><i>कीम</i><par n="जरद/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="कोटि"><i>कोटि</i><par n="नति__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="शहबाला"><i>शहबाल</i><par n="ध/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="दवाअ"><i>दवा</i><par n="दवा/अ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="गलतफहमी"><i>गलतफहम</i><par n="कम/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="गेहूँ"><i>गेह</i><par n="गेह/ूँ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="लौ"><i>लौ</i><par n="गौ__n_f"/></e>
